test/src/morphology/V-uzany_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - узаны: # Verb UZA узаны 'eng /udm /fin' - full paradigm
     узаны+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: узасько
     узаны+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: узаськод
     узаны+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: уза
     узаны+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: [узаськом, узаськомы]
     узаны+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: узаськоды
     узаны+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: узало
     узаны+V+Ind+Fut+Sg1: узало
     узаны+V+Ind+Fut+Sg2: узалод
     узаны+V+Ind+Fut+Sg3: узалоз
     узаны+V+Ind+Fut+Pl1: [узаломы, узалом]
     узаны+V+Ind+Fut+Pl2: узалоды
     узаны+V+Ind+Fut+Pl3: узалозы
     узаны+V+Ind+PstI+Sg1: уза
     узаны+V+Ind+PstI+Sg2: узад
     узаны+V+Ind+PstI+Sg3: узаз
     узаны+V+Ind+PstI+Pl1: [узамы, узам]
     узаны+V+Ind+PstI+Pl2: узады
     узаны+V+Ind+PstI+Pl3: узазы
     узаны+V+Ind+PstII+Sg1: узаме
     узаны+V+Ind+PstII+Sg2: узамед
     узаны+V+Ind+PstII+Sg3: узамез
     узаны+V+Ind+PstII+Pl1: узаммы
     узаны+V+Ind+PstII+Pl2: узамды
     узаны+V+Ind+PstII+Pl3: узамзы

     узаны+V+Ind+Cond: узасал
